Nebraska, session 109, LB716.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. Section 71-5661, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
is amended to read:
71-5661 (1) The financial incentives provided by the Rural Health Systems
and Professional Incentive Act shall consist of (a) student loans to eligible
students for attendance at an eligible school as determined pursuant to section
71-5662, (b) the repayment of qualified educational debts owed by physicians
and psychiatrists in an approved medical specialty residency program in
Nebraska as determined pursuant to section 71-5662, and (c) the repayment of
qualified educational debts owed by eligible health professionals as determined
pursuant to section 71-5662. Funds for such incentives shall be appropriated
from the General Fund to the department for such purposes.
(2) The Rural Health Professional Incentive Fund is created. The fund
shall be used to carry out the purposes of the act, except that transfers may
be made from the fund to the General Fund at the direction of the Legislature.
Payments Money credited pursuant to section 71-5670.01 and payments received
pursuant to sections 71-5666, 71-5668, and 71-5669.01 shall be remitted to the
State Treasurer for credit to the Rural Health Professional Incentive Fund. Any
money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state
investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the
Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
Sec. 2. Section 72-816, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is amended
to read:
72-816 (1) The Vacant Building and Excess Land Cash Fund is created. The
fund shall consist of proceeds credited to the fund pursuant to section
sections 72-815 and 90-268. The Except as provided in sections 90-268 and
90-269, the fund shall be used to pay for the maintenance of vacant state
buildings and excess state land and for expenses related to the disposal of
state buildings and land referred to the Department of Administrative Services
by the committee pursuant to sections 72-811 to 72-818. The fund shall be
administered by the state building division of the Department of Administrative
Services. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by
the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and
the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Funds may be transferred from the
Vacant Building and Excess Land Cash Fund to the General Fund at the direction
of the Legislature.
(2) If there are insufficient funds in the fund to enable the division to
fully implement the orders of the committee issued pursuant to sections 72-811
to 72-818, the division shall implement them in the order which most
efficiently meets the purposes of such sections.
(3) Funds appropriated to the Task Force for Building Renewal shall not be
used to carry out any of the purposes of such sections (a) unless the building
would otherwise qualify for the use of such funds pursuant to the Deferred
Building Renewal Act and (b) except for any expenses incurred by the
administrator of the Task Force for Building Renewal in fulfilling his or her
duties under such sections.
Sec. 3. Section 81-829.33, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
81-829.33 The Governor's Emergency Cash Fund is created. The fund shall
consist of federal reimbursements received by the state for eligible state
administrative costs incurred by the Nebraska Emergency Management Agency for
administering federal emergency disaster declarations and revenue from all
other nonfederal government sources. The Except as provided in section 90-270,
the fund shall be used to pay eligible costs related to state emergency
disaster declarations. The fund shall be administered by the State
Administrator of the Nebraska Emergency Management Agency. Any money in the
fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer
pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds
Investment Act. Beginning October 1, 2024, any investment earnings from
investment of money in the fund shall be credited to the General Fund.
-1-

LB716 LB716
2026 2026
Transfers may be made from the Governor's Emergency Cash Fund to the Cash
Reserve Fund and General Fund at the direction of the Legislature. The State
Treasurer shall transfer zero dollars from the Governor's Emergency Cash Fund
to the Cash Reserve Fund by June 30, 2023, on such dates and in such amounts as
directed by the budget administrator of the budget division of the Department
of Administrative Services.
Sec. 4. Original sections 72-816 and 81-829.33, Reissue Revised Statutes
of Nebraska, and section 71-5661, Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 2024,
are repealed.
Sec. 5. The following sections are outright repealed: Sections 50-301,
50-302, 50-303, 50-304, 50-305, 50-306, 71-5670.01, 90-267, 90-268, 90-269,
90-270, and 90-563, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, and section 90-562,
Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025.
-2-